Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.020

Statewide director for math, science, and technology—Duties—Reporting.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, obtain a statewide license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive, project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that includes a comprehensive professional development component for teachers and, if possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic program evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;

(2) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a public-private partnership to assist school districts with implementing an ongoing, inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state science grade level expectations;

(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a public-private partnership to provide enriching opportunities in mathematics, engineering, and science for underrepresented students in grades kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and instructional approaches;

(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and high school students to careers in math, science, and technology and to educate students about the coursework that is necessary to be adequately prepared to succeed in these fields;

(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and technology, including facilitating student participation in school clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to facilitate such student participation;

(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:

(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in subsection (5) of this section;

(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships, and apprenticeships;

(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training, including on-the-job professional development opportunities;

(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology programs;

(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that are necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant field;

(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts, including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and technology programs;

(9) Subject to available funding, working with the state board for community and technical colleges to develop high-demand applied baccalaureate programs that align with high quality secondary science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs and career and technical education programs; and

(10) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

[ 2013 c 55 s 1; 2007 c 396 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.300.515.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: "The legislature finds that knowledge, skills, and opportunities in mathematics, science, and technology should be increased for all students in Washington. The legislature intends to foster capacity between and among the educational sectors to enable continuous and sustainable growth of the learning and teaching of mathematics, science, and technologies. The legislature intends to foster high quality mathematics, science, and technology programs to increase the number of students in the kindergarten through twelfth grade pipeline who are prepared and aspire to continue in the areas of mathematics, science, and technology, whether it be at a college, university, or in the workforce." [ 2007 c 396 s 12.]

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.